Nebraska, session 109, LB462.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-101 Sections 28-101 to 28-1357, 28-1601 to 28-1603, and 28-1701,
and section 2 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska
Criminal Code.
Sec. 2. (1) Permitting a minor child, who is of sufficient
maturity, physical condition, and mental ability to avoid a substantial
risk of physical harm, to engage in independent activities, either alone
or with other children, shall not be considered child abuse under section
28-707 or child abuse or neglect under section 28-710.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Independent activities include: (i) Traveling, including, but
not limited to, by walking, running, or bicycling, to and from school or
nearby commercial or recreational facilities; (ii) playing outdoors;
(iii) remaining unattended in a motor vehicle, unless it is in conditions
likely to cause serious harm that have not been mitigated by reasonable
precautionary measures; or (iv) remaining at home unattended for a
reasonable amount of time, if the person has made provisions for any
reasonably foreseeable emergencies that may arise; and
(b) Maturity means having adequate social, emotional, cognitive, and
developmental abilities to safely handle an activity or situation.
Sec. 3. Section 28-707, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-707 (1) Subject to section 2 of this act, a A person commits
child abuse if he or she knowingly, intentionally, or negligently causes
or permits a minor child to be:
(a) Placed in a situation that endangers the minor child's his or
her life or physical or mental health under circumstance such that the
danger is sufficiently obvious that a reasonable and prudent person would
not cause or permit the child to be placed in such situation;
(b) Cruelly confined or cruelly punished;
-2-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
(c) Willfully deprived Deprived of necessary food, clothing,
shelter, or care;
(d) Placed in a situation to be sexually exploited through sex
trafficking of a minor as defined in section 28-830 or by allowing,
encouraging, or forcing such minor child to engage in debauchery, public
indecency, or obscene or pornographic photography, films, or depictions;
(e) Placed in a situation to be sexually abused as defined in
section 28-319, 28-319.01, or 28-320.01; or
(f) Placed in a situation to be a trafficking victim as defined in
section 28-830.
(2) The statutory privilege between patient and physician, between
client and professional counselor, and between husband and wife shall not
be available for excluding or refusing testimony in any prosecution for a
violation of this section.
(3) Child abuse is a Class I misdemeanor if the offense is committed
negligently and does not result in serious bodily injury as defined in
section 28-109 or death.
(4) Child abuse is a Class IIIA felony if the offense is committed
knowingly and intentionally and does not result in serious bodily injury
as defined in section 28-109 or death.
(5) Child abuse is a Class IIIA felony if the offense is committed
negligently and results in serious bodily injury as defined in section
28-109.
(6) Child abuse is a Class IIA felony if the offense is committed
negligently and results in the death of such child.
(7) Child abuse is a Class II felony if the offense is committed
knowingly and intentionally and results in serious bodily injury as
defined in such section.
(8) Child abuse is a Class IB felony if the offense is committed
knowingly and intentionally and results in the death of such child.
(9) For purposes of this section, negligently refers to criminal
-3-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
negligence and means that a person knew or should have known of the
danger involved and acted recklessly, as defined in section 28-109, with
respect to the safety or health of the minor child.
Sec. 4. Section 28-710, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-710 (1) Sections 28-710 to 28-727 shall be known and may be cited
as the Child Protection and Family Safety Act.
(2) For purposes of the Child Protection and Family Safety Act:
(a) Alternative response means a comprehensive assessment of (i)
child safety, (ii) the risk of future child abuse or neglect, (iii)
family strengths and needs, and (iv) the provision of or referral for
necessary services and support. Alternative response is an alternative to
traditional response and does not include an investigation or a formal
determination as to whether child abuse or neglect has occurred, and the
subject of the report shall not be entered into the central registry of
child protection cases maintained pursuant to section 28-718;
(b) Subject to section 2 of this act, child Child abuse or neglect
means knowingly, intentionally, or negligently causing or permitting a
minor child to be:
(i) Placed in a situation that endangers the minor child's his or
her life or physical or mental health under circumstances such that the
danger is sufficiently obvious that a reasonable and prudent person would
not cause or permit the child to be placed in such situation;
(ii) Cruelly confined or cruelly punished;
(iii) Willfully deprived Deprived of necessary food, clothing,
shelter, or care;
(iv) Left unattended in a motor vehicle if such minor child is six
years of age or younger in conditions likely to cause serious harm that
have not been mitigated by reasonable precautionary measures;
(v) Placed in a situation to be sexually abused;
(vi) Placed in a situation to be sexually exploited through sex
-4-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
trafficking of a minor as defined in section 28-830 or by allowing,
encouraging, or forcing such person to engage in debauchery, public
indecency, or obscene or pornographic photography, films, or depictions;
or
(vii) Placed in a situation to be a trafficking victim as defined in
section 28-830;
(c) Child advocacy center means a community-based organization that
(i) provides an appropriate site for conducting forensic interviews as
defined in section 28-728 and referring victims of child abuse or neglect
and appropriate caregivers for such victims to needed evaluation,
services, and supports, (ii) assists county attorneys in facilitating
case reviews, developing and updating protocols, and arranging training
opportunities for the teams established pursuant to sections 28-728 and
28-729, and (iii) is a member, in good standing, of a state chapter as
defined in 34 U.S.C. 20302;
(d) Comprehensive assessment means an analysis of child safety, risk
of future child abuse or neglect, and family strengths and needs on a
report of child abuse or neglect using an evidence-informed and validated
tool. Comprehensive assessment does not include a finding as to whether
the child abuse or neglect occurred but does determine the need for
services and support, if any, to address the safety of children and the
risk of future abuse or neglect;
(e) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(f) Investigation means fact gathering by the department, using an
evidence-informed and validated tool, or by law enforcement related to
the current safety of a child and the risk of future child abuse or
neglect that determines whether child abuse or neglect has occurred and
whether child protective services are needed;
(g) Kin caregiver means a person with whom a child in foster care
has been placed or with whom a child is residing pursuant to a temporary
living arrangement in a non-court-involved case, who has previously lived
-5-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
with or is a trusted adult that has a preexisting, significant
relationship with the child or with a sibling of such child placed
pursuant to section 43-1311.02;
(h) Law enforcement agency means the police department or town
marshal in incorporated municipalities, the office of the sheriff in
unincorporated areas, and the Nebraska State Patrol;
(i) Mandatory reporter means any:
(i) Physician, doctor of osteopathy, medical resident or intern,
medical administrator or personnel, licensed mental health practitioner,
psychologist, psychiatrist, provisional mental health practitioner,
licensed independent mental health practitioner, marriage and family
therapist, alcohol and drug counselor, professional counselor, surgeon,
dentist, dental hygienist, physician assistant, physical therapist,
physical therapy assistant, occupational therapist, occupational therapy
assistant, acupuncturist, registered nurse, practical nurse, genetic
counselor, respiratory care practitioner, home health aide, nurse aide,
or social worker;
(ii) Emergency medical responder, emergency medical technician,
advanced emergency medical technician, or paramedic licensed under the
Emergency Medical Services Practice Act or practicing pursuant to the EMS
Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact;
(iii) Law enforcement officer;
(iv) Church employee;
(v) School employee;
(vi) Employee of a facility or program licensed under the Child Care
Licensing Act, the Children's Residential Facilities and Placing
Licensure Act, or section 71-1901 to 71-1906.01;
(vii) Employee of a youth rehabilitation and treatment center or
juvenile detention facility;
(viii) Employee of a youth sports, recreation, or mentorship
organization;
-6-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
(ix) Employee of the office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child
Welfare or the office of Public Counsel; or
(x) Parenting Act mediator;
(j) (i) Non-court-involved case means an ongoing case opened by the
department following a report of child abuse or neglect in which the
department has determined that ongoing services are required to maintain
the safety of a child or alleviate the risk of future abuse or neglect
and in which the family voluntarily engages in child protective services
without a filing in a juvenile court;
(k) (j) Out-of-home child abuse or neglect means child abuse or
neglect occurring outside of a child's family home, including in day care
homes, foster homes, day care centers, residential child-caring agencies
as defined in section 71-1926, other child care facilities or
institutions, and the community. Out-of-home child abuse or neglect also
includes cases in which the subject of the report of child abuse or
neglect is not a member of the child's household, no longer has access to
the child, is unknown, or cannot be identified;
(l) (k) Relative caregiver means a person with whom a child is
placed by the department and who is related to the child, or to a sibling
of such child pursuant to section 43-1311.02, by blood, marriage, or
adoption or, in the case of an Indian child, is an extended family member
as defined in section 43-1503;
(m) (l) Report means any communication received by the department or
a law enforcement agency pursuant to the Child Protection and Family
Safety Act that describes child abuse or neglect and contains sufficient
content to identify the child who is the alleged victim of child abuse or
neglect;
(n) (m) Review, Evaluate, and Decide Team means an internal team of
staff within the department and shall include no fewer than two
supervisors or administrators and two staff members knowledgeable on the
policies and practices of the department, including, but not limited to,
-7-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
the structured review process. County attorneys, child advocacy centers,
or law enforcement agency personnel may attend team reviews upon request
of a party;
(o) (n) School employee means a person nineteen years of age or
older who is employed by a public, private, denominational, or parochial
school approved or accredited by the State Department of Education;
(p) (o) Student means a person less than nineteen years of age
enrolled in or attending a public, private, denominational, or parochial
school approved or accredited by the State Department of Education, or
who was such a person enrolled in or who attended such a school within
ninety days of any violation of section 28-316.01;
(q) (p) Traditional response means an investigation by a law
enforcement agency or the department pursuant to section 28-713 which
requires a formal determination of whether child abuse or neglect has
occurred; and
(r) (q) Subject of the report of child abuse or neglect or subject
of the report means the person or persons identified in the report as
responsible for the child abuse or neglect.
Sec. 5. Section 28-711, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-711 (1) When a person required to report suspected child abuse or
neglect, in such person's professional capacity or within the scope of
the person's employment, any physician, any medical institution, any
nurse, any school employee, any social worker, the Inspector General
appointed under section 43-4317, or any other person has knowledge of
reasonable cause to believe that a child has been subjected to child
abuse or neglect or observes a such child being subjected to conditions
or circumstances which reasonably would result in child abuse or neglect,
the person he or she shall report such knowledge or observation, incident
or cause a report of child abuse or neglect to be made, to the proper law
enforcement agency or to the department on the toll-free number
-8-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
established by subsection (4) (2) of this section. Such report may be
made orally by telephone with the caller giving his or her name and
address, shall be followed by a written report, and to the extent
available shall contain the address and age of the abused or neglected
child, the address of the person or persons having custody of the abused
or neglected child, the nature and extent of the child abuse or neglect
or the conditions and circumstances which would reasonably result in such
child abuse or neglect, any evidence of previous child abuse or neglect
including the nature and extent, and any other information which in the
opinion of the person may be helpful in establishing the cause of such
child abuse or neglect and the identity of the perpetrator or
perpetrators. Law enforcement agencies receiving any reports of child
abuse or neglect under this subsection shall notify the department
pursuant to section 28-718 on the next working day by telephone or mail.
(2) Any other person who has knowledge of, or observes, a child
being subjected to conditions or circumstances which reasonably would
result from, or in, child abuse or neglect, may report such knowledge or
observation pursuant to the procedure described in subsection (1) of this
section. This includes, but is not limited to, a mandatory reporter who
is not acting in the mandatory reporter's professional capacity or within
the scope of the mandatory reporter's employment, and a volunteer of a
public or private organization that employs mandatory reporters.
(3)(a) For purposes of this section, institution means any public or
private residential institution or facility housing juveniles, medical
institution, or school or any religious organization, institution, or
facility.
(b) An employee of an institution required to make a report under
subsection (1) of this section may, after making the report pursuant to
the procedure described in subsection (1) of this section, notify the
individual in charge of such institution, or the individual's designated
agent, of the suspected child abuse or neglect.
-9-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
(4) (2) The department shall establish a statewide toll-free number
to be used by any person any hour of the day or night, any day of the
week, to make reports of child abuse or neglect. Reports of child abuse
or neglect not previously made to or by a law enforcement agency shall be
made immediately to such agency by the department.
(5)(a) Beginning October 1, 2027, each person required to report
suspected child abuse or neglect under subsection (1) of this section
shall complete training provided or approved by the department regarding
child abuse or neglect. Such training shall be completed within the first
ninety days after beginning employment or service in the person's
official capacity as a mandatory reporter and at least every two years
thereafter. The training shall include: (i) Identification of child abuse
and neglect; (ii) reporting of child abuse or neglect; (iii) trauma-
informed responses to suspected child abuse and neglect; (iv) implicit
bias, cultural competency, and race-conscious reporting; and (v)
alternatives to child abuse and neglect reporting, including available
community resources and preventative services.
(b) No later than October 1, 2027, the department shall create a
free, publicly available online training for all persons required to
report suspected child abuse or neglect consistent with the requirements
of subdivision (5)(a) of this section. The training shall be created in
consultation with organizations that have expertise and experience in the
areas of implicit bias and culturally diverse family systems. The
department shall update such training at least once every five years.
(6) No later than October 1, 2027, the department shall adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations to implement this section.
Sec. 6. Section 28-714, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-714 The privileged communication between patient and physician,
between client and professional counselor, and between husband and wife
shall not be a ground for excluding evidence in any judicial proceeding
-10-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
resulting from a report of child abuse or neglect made pursuant to
required by section 28-711.
Sec. 7. Section 28-715, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-715 The department shall retain all information from all reports
of suspected child abuse or neglect made pursuant to required by section
28-711 and all records generated as a result of such reports in a
tracking system of child protection cases. The tracking system shall be
used for statistical purposes as well as a reference for future
investigations if subsequent reports of child abuse or neglect are made
involving the same victim or subject of a report of child abuse or
neglect.
Sec. 8. Section 28-716, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-716 Any person participating in an investigation or the making of
a report of child abuse or neglect made pursuant to required by section
28-711 pursuant to or participating in a judicial proceeding resulting
therefrom or providing information or assistance, including a medical
evaluation or consultation in connection with an investigation, a report,
or a judicial proceeding pursuant to a report of child abuse or neglect,
shall be immune from any liability, civil or criminal, that might
otherwise be incurred or imposed, except for maliciously false
statements.
Sec. 9. Section 28-728, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-728 (1) The Legislature finds that child abuse and neglect are
community problems requiring a coordinated response by law enforcement,
child advocacy centers, prosecutors, the Department of Health and Human
Services, and other agencies or entities designed to protect children. It
is the intent of the Legislature to create a child abuse and neglect
investigation team in each county or contiguous group of counties and to
-11-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
create a child abuse and neglect treatment team in each county or
contiguous group of counties.
(2) Each county or contiguous group of counties will be assigned by
the Department of Health and Human Services to a child advocacy center.
The purpose of a child advocacy center is to provide a child-focused
location for conducting forensic interviews and medical evaluations for
alleged child victims of abuse and neglect and for coordinating a
multidisciplinary team response that supports the physical, emotional,
and psychological needs of children who are alleged victims of abuse or
neglect. Each child advocacy center shall meet accreditation criteria set
forth by the National Children's Alliance. Nothing in this section shall
prevent a child from receiving treatment or other services at a child
advocacy center which has received or is in the process of receiving
accreditation.
(3) Each county attorney or the county attorney representing a
contiguous group of counties is responsible for convening the child abuse
and neglect investigation team and ensuring that protocols are
established and implemented. A representative of the child advocacy
center assigned to the team shall assist the county attorney in
facilitating case review, developing and updating protocols, and
arranging training opportunities for the team. Each team must have
protocols which, at a minimum, shall include procedures for:
(a) Mandatory reporting of child abuse and neglect as outlined in
section 28-711 to include training to professionals on identification and
reporting of abuse and the subjects listed in subdivision (5)(a) of
section 28-711;
(b) Assigning roles and responsibilities between law enforcement and
the Department of Health and Human Services for the initial response;
(c) Outlining how reports will be shared between law enforcement and
the Department of Health and Human Services under sections 28-712.01 and
28-713;
-12-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
(d) Coordinating the investigative response including, but not
limited to:
(i) Defining cases that require a priority response;
(ii) Contacting the reporting party;
(iii) Arranging for a video-recorded forensic interview at a child
advocacy center for children who are three to eighteen years of age and
are alleged to be victims of sexual abuse or serious physical abuse or
neglect, have witnessed a violent crime, are found in a drug-endangered
environment, or have been recovered from a kidnapping;
(iv) Assessing the need for and arranging, when indicated, a medical
evaluation of the alleged child victim;
(v) Assessing the need for and arranging, when indicated,
appropriate mental health services for the alleged child victim or
nonoffender caregiver;
(vi) Conducting collateral interviews with other persons with
information pertinent to the investigation including other potential
victims;
(vii) Collecting, processing, and preserving physical evidence
including photographing the crime scene as well as any physical injuries
as a result of the alleged child abuse and neglect; and
(viii) Interviewing the alleged perpetrator;
(e) Reducing the risk of harm to alleged child abuse and neglect
victims;
(f) Ensuring that the child is in safe surroundings, including
removing the perpetrator when necessary or arranging for temporary
custody of the child when the child is seriously endangered in his or her
surroundings and immediate removal appears to be necessary for the
child's protection as provided in section 43-248;
(g) Sharing of case information between team members; and
(h) Outlining what cases will be reviewed by the investigation team
including, but not limited to:
-13-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
(i) Cases of sexual abuse, serious physical abuse and neglect, drug-
endangered children, and serious or ongoing domestic violence;
(ii) Cases determined by the Department of Health and Human Services
to be high or very high risk for further maltreatment; and
(iii) Any other case referred by a member of the team when a system-
response issue has been identified.
(4) Each county attorney or the county attorney representing a
contiguous group of counties is responsible for convening the child abuse
and neglect treatment team and ensuring that protocols are established
and implemented. A representative of the child advocacy center appointed
to the team shall assist the county attorney in facilitating case review,
developing and updating protocols, and arranging training opportunities
for the team. Each team must have protocols which, at a minimum, shall
include procedures for:
(a) Case coordination and assistance, including the location of
services available within the area;
(b) Case staffings and the coordination, development,
implementation, and monitoring of treatment or safety plans particularly
in those cases in which ongoing services are provided by the Department
of Health and Human Services or a contracted agency but the juvenile
court is not involved;
(c) Reducing the risk of harm to child abuse and neglect victims;
(d) Assisting those child abuse and neglect victims who are abused
and neglected by perpetrators who do not reside in their homes; and
(e) Working with multiproblem status offenders and delinquent youth.
(5) For purposes of sections 28-728 to 28-730, forensic interview
means a video-recorded interview of an alleged child victim conducted at
a child advocacy center by a professional with specialized training
designed to elicit details about alleged incidents of abuse or neglect,
and such interview may result in intervention in criminal or juvenile
court.
-14-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
Sec. 10. Section 28-729, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-729 (1) A child abuse and neglect investigation team shall
include a representative from the county attorney's office, a
representative from the Division of Children and Family Services of the
Department of Health and Human Services, a representative from each law
enforcement agency which has jurisdiction within the county or contiguous
group of counties, a representative from the child advocacy center, and
representatives from such other agencies as determined by the team.
(2) A child abuse and neglect treatment team shall include a
representative from the Division of Children and Family Services of the
Department of Health and Human Services, a juvenile probation officer, a
representative from each of the mental health profession and the medical
profession actively practicing within the county or contiguous group of
counties, a representative from each school district which provides
services within the county or contiguous group of counties, a
representative from the child advocacy center, and representatives from
such other agencies as determined by the team. For purposes of this
subsection, more than one school district may be represented by the same
individual.
(3) The teams established pursuant to this section and section
28-728 shall be encouraged to expand their membership to include the
various relevant disciplines which exist within the county or contiguous
group of counties. The additional members shall have the requisite
experience necessary as determined by the core members of the teams.
Consistent with requirements set out by the teams, all members of both
teams shall attend child abuse and neglect training on an annual basis.
Such training shall be no less than eight hours annually and consist of
the following components:
(a) Child abuse and neglect investigation procedures;
(b) Legal requirements and procedures for successful prosecution of
-15-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
child abuse and neglect cases;
(c) Roles and responsibilities of child protective services, law
enforcement agencies, county attorneys, child advocacy centers, the
Attorney General, and judges;
(d) Characteristics of child development and family dynamics;
(e) Recognition of various types of abuse and neglect;
(f) Duties of a person required to report suspected child abuse or
neglect as required by section 28-711; Duty of public and private
individuals and agencies, including schools, governmental agencies,
physicians, and child advocates, to report suspected or known child
abuse;
(g) Multidisciplinary approaches to providing services to children;
and
(h) Continually identifying and improving weaknesses in the current
child protection system and developing ongoing best practices.
(4) The representative of the child advocacy center shall report the
name and address of each team member and the number of times the team met
within a calendar year to the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and
Criminal Justice.
(5) Each team shall meet at a location agreed to by the team. The
number of meetings of the team shall be secondary to the caseload of the
team, but each team shall meet at least quarterly. Each team may
substitute a telephone conference call among team members in lieu of
meeting in person. If a team fails to convene, the commission shall
notify the Child Protection Division of the office of the Attorney
General and the division shall appoint the team members or convene the
team pursuant to sections 28-728 to 28-730. Nothing in this section shall
relieve the county attorney from ensuring that the teams meet as required
by this section.
Sec. 11. Section 43-247, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
-16-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
43-247 The juvenile court in each county shall have jurisdiction of:
(1) Any juvenile who has committed an act other than a traffic
offense which would constitute a misdemeanor or an infraction under the
laws of this state, or violation of a city or village ordinance, and who
was eleven years of age or older at the time the act was committed;
(2) Any juvenile who has committed an act which would constitute a
felony under the laws of this state and who was eleven years of age or
older at the time the act was committed;
(3) Any juvenile:
(a) Subject to section 14 of this act:
(i) Who is homeless, or destitute, or without necessary proper
support through no fault of the juvenile's his or her parent, guardian,
or custodian;
(ii) Who who is abandoned by the juvenile's his or her parent,
guardian, or custodian;
(iii) Whose who lacks proper parental care by reason of the fault or
habits of his or her parent, guardian, or custodian; whose parent,
guardian, or custodian willfully neglects or refuses to provide proper or
necessary subsistence, education, or other care necessary for the health,
safety morals, or well-being of such juvenile;
(iv) Whose whose parent, guardian, or custodian willfully is unable
to provide or neglects or refuses to provide special care made necessary
by the mental condition of the juvenile;
(v) Who who is in a situation, including labor or sex trafficking of
a minor, as defined in section 28-830, which is or engages in an
occupation, including prostitution, dangerous to life or limb or
injurious to the health, safety, or well-being or morals of such
juvenile; or
(vi) Who who has committed an act or engaged in behavior described
in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of this section and who was under
eleven years of age at the time of such act or behavior;
-17-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
(b) Who is eleven years of age or older and who (i) by reason of
being wayward or habitually disobedient, is uncontrolled by his or her
parent, guardian, or custodian; (ii) deports himself or herself so as to
injure or endanger seriously the safety, or well-being morals or health
of himself, herself, or others; or (iii) is habitually truant from home
or school; or
(c) Who is mentally ill and dangerous as defined in section 71-908;
(4) Any juvenile who has committed an act which would constitute a
traffic offense as defined in section 43-245 and who was eleven years of
age or older at the time the act was committed;
(5) The parent, guardian, or custodian of any juvenile described in
this section;
(6) The proceedings for termination of parental rights;
(7) Any juvenile who has been voluntarily relinquished, pursuant to
section 43-106.01, to the Department of Health and Human Services or any
child placement agency licensed by the Department of Health and Human
Services;
(8) Any juvenile who was a ward of the juvenile court at the
inception of his or her guardianship and whose guardianship has been
disrupted or terminated;
(9) The adoption or guardianship proceedings for a child over which
the juvenile court already has jurisdiction under another provision of
the Nebraska Juvenile Code;
(10) The paternity or custody determination for a child over which
the juvenile court already has jurisdiction;
(11) The proceedings under the Young Adult Bridge to Independence
Act; and
(12) Except as provided in subdivision (11) of this section, any
individual adjudged to be within the provisions of this section until the
individual reaches the age of majority or the court otherwise discharges
the individual from its jurisdiction.
-18-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
Notwithstanding the provisions of the Nebraska Juvenile Code, the
determination of jurisdiction over any Indian child as defined in section
43-1503 shall be subject to the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act; and
the district court shall have exclusive jurisdiction in proceedings
brought pursuant to section 71-510.
Sec. 12. Section 43-292, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-292 Subject to section 14 of this act, the The court may
terminate all parental rights between the parents or the mother of a
juvenile born out of wedlock and such juvenile when the court finds such
action to be in the best interests of the juvenile and it appears by the
evidence that one or more of the following conditions exist:
(1) The parents have abandoned the juvenile for six months or more
immediately prior to the filing of the petition;
(2) The parents have substantially and continuously or repeatedly
neglected and refused to give the juvenile or a sibling of the juvenile
necessary parental care and protection;
(3) The parents, being financially able, have willfully neglected to
provide the juvenile with the necessary subsistence, education, or other
care necessary for his or her health, morals, or welfare or have
neglected to pay for such subsistence, education, or other care when
legal custody of the juvenile is lodged with others and such payment
ordered by the court;
(4) The parents are unfit by reason of debauchery, habitual use of
intoxicating liquor or narcotic drugs, or repeated lewd and lascivious
behavior, which conduct is found by the court to be seriously detrimental
to the health, safety morals, or well-being of the juvenile;
(5) The parents are unable to discharge parental responsibilities
because of mental illness or mental deficiency and there are reasonable
grounds to believe that such condition will continue for a prolonged
indeterminate period;
-19-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
(6) Following a determination that the juvenile is one as described
in subdivision (3)(a) of section 43-247, reasonable efforts to preserve
and reunify the family if required under section 43-283.01, under the
direction of the court, have failed to correct the conditions leading to
the determination;
(7) The juvenile has been in an out-of-home placement for fifteen or
more months of the most recent twenty-two months;
(8) The parent has inflicted upon the juvenile, by other than
accidental means, serious bodily injury;
(9) The parent of the juvenile has subjected the juvenile or another
minor child to aggravated circumstances, including, but not limited to,
abandonment, torture, chronic abuse, or sexual abuse;
(10) The parent has (a) committed murder of another child of the
parent, (b) committed voluntary manslaughter of another child of the
parent, (c) aided or abetted, attempted, conspired, or solicited to
commit murder, or aided or abetted voluntary manslaughter of the juvenile
or another child of the parent, or (d) committed a felony assault that
resulted in serious bodily injury to the juvenile or another minor child
of the parent; or
(11) One parent has been convicted of felony sexual assault of the
other parent under section 28-319.01 or 28-320.01 or a comparable crime
in another state.
Sec. 13. Section 43-2,129, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-2,129 Sections 43-245 to 43-2,129 and section 14 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Juvenile Code.
Sec. 14. (1) The fact that a person permits a juvenile, who is of
sufficient maturity, physical condition, and mental ability to avoid a
substantial risk of physical harm, to engage in independent activities,
either alone or with other children, shall not be a basis for the
juvenile court to exercise jurisdiction under subdivision (3)(a) of
-20-

LB462 LB462
2025 2025
section 43-247 or to terminate parental rights under section 43-292.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Independent activities include, but are not limited to: (i)
Traveling, including, but not limited to, by walking, running, or
bicycling, to and from school or nearby commercial or recreational
facilities; (ii) playing outdoors; (iii) remaining unattended in a motor
vehicle, unless it is in conditions likely to cause serious harm that
have not been mitigated by reasonable precautionary measures; or (iv)
remaining at home unattended for a reasonable amount of time, if the
person has made provisions for any reasonably foreseeable emergencies
that may arise; and
(b) Maturity means having adequate social, emotional, cognitive, and
developmental abilities to safely handle an activity or situation.
Sec. 15. Original sections 28-711, 28-714, 28-715, 28-729, and
43-292, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 28-101,
28-707, 28-710, 28-716, 28-728, 43-247, and 43-2,129, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-21-